Hawaii statutes.
§803-7 Use of force. In all cases
where the person arrested refuses to submit or attempts to escape, such degree
of force may be used as is necessary to compel the person to submission. [PC
1869, c 49, §7; RL 1925, §3973; RL 1935, §5406; RL 1945, §10707; RL 1955,
§255-7; HRS §708-7; ren L 1972, c 9, pt of §1; gen ch 1985]

Cross References

Justifiable use of force, see §703-307.

Case Notes

Breaking gate, when proper. 1 H. 72 (1852).

Officer not liable for injuries inflicted in use of
reasonably necessary force to preserve peace and maintain order or to overcome
resistance to the officer's authority. 24 H. 477, 482 (1918); 30 H. 487 (1928).
See 9 H. 522 (1894).

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next